Washington statutes.
RCW 11.10.020

Gift from mixed separate and community property.

To the extent that a gift is to be satisfied out of a source that consists of both separate and community property, unless otherwise indicated in the will it is presumed to be a gift from separate and community property in proportion to their relative value in the property or fund from which the gift is to be satisfied.

[ 1994 c 221 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1994 c 221: See note following RCW 11.100.035.